Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.445

Protection of pollinator health—Report to the legislature.

(1) The department shall continue to evaluate and update, as necessary, pesticide regulatory and education programs focused on measures to protect pollinator health. This work by the department, when appropriate, must be coordinated with Washington State University pesticide education programs to limit duplication and ensure consistent information sharing.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, and in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife with regard to considerations for native pollinator species, the department must:

(a) Evaluate and adapt pesticide training and drift reduction technical assistance programs to include up-to-date protection measures for pollinators;

(b) Support Washington State University's pesticide education programs continued incorporation of pollinator protection measures during their training and certification classes, and coordinate on presented research, new protection measures, technological advancements, and any other significant science-based information;

(c) Coordinate with pollinator health staff in the department and at Washington State University to conduct investigations and share annual findings from pesticide-related investigations with the pollinator health task force;

(d) Evaluate and, if necessary, update the pesticide civil penalty matrix related to pollinator death or damage due to the misuse of pesticides and ensure pollinator health protections are included;

(e) When possible, the department must provide credits for pesticide courses focused on pollinator protection measures.

(3) By December 31, 2021, the department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, that includes recommendations for measures to mitigate the risks of harm to bees and other pollinators from the use of neonicotinoid pesticides and treated seeds. The department shall evaluate and incorporate the reviews scheduled for completion by the United States environmental protection agency during 2021, including recommended mitigation measures from that agency. The department shall also review neonicotinoid pesticide use restrictions and labeling requirements adopted in other states and include in the report any recommendations for adoption of similar requirements in this state.

[ 2021 c 278 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—2021 c 278: See note following RCW 43.23.300.